apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_adj.en.dix
  <pardef n="lovel/y__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or deleting -y and adding -ier and -iest (LR) respectively ">
       <p>
         <l>y</l>
         <r>y<s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ier</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>iest</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="handsome/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or directly adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>r</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>st</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/good__adj">
    <e c="CP: good comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l>good</l>
        <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>better</l>
        <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>best</l>
        <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="/bad__adj">
    <e c="CP: bad comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l>bad</l>
        <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>worse</l>
        <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>worst</l>
        <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

  
  <pardef n="f/ar__adj">
    <e c="CP: far comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l>ar</l>
        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urther</l>
        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>arther</l>
        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urthest</l>
        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>arthest</l>
        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>


  <pardef n="glad/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>der</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>dest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="broad/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either adding -er and -est or with more and the most (LR)">
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>est</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="drab/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ber</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>best</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef> 
  
  <pardef n="flat/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ter</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>test</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="fun/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either doubling the final consonant and adding -er and -est or directly adding -er and -est respectively">
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ner</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>est</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="glum/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>mer</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>mest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="up/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -p and add -per and -pest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>per</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>pest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>



<pardef n="mine__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 </pardefs>

<e lm="hers"><i>hers</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
<e lm="his"><i>his</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
<e lm="likely"><i>likel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mine"><i>mine</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ours"><i>ours</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
<e lm="theirs"><i>theirs</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
<e lm="yours"><i>yours</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bad"><i></i><par n="/bad__adj"/></e>
<e lm="good"><i></i><par n="/good__adj"/></e>
<e lm="crumbly"><i>crumbl</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="binary"><i>binar</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lossy"><i>loss</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="red"><i>red</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="extreme"><i>extreme</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="spare"><i>spare</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="timely"><i>timel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sad"><i>sad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ochre"><i>ochre</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="handsome"><i>handsome</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="severe"><i>severe</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="spongy"><i>spong</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="flat"><i>flat</i><par n="flat/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pale"><i>pale</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="elderly"><i>elderl</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fragile"><i>fragile</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fun"><i>fun</i><par n="fun/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="far"><i>f</i><par n="f/ar__adj"/></e>
<e lm="broad"><i>broad</i><par n="broad/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aware"><i>aware</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ripe"><i>ripe</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="unripe"><i>unripe</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alive"><i>alive</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lively"><i>livel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
